Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-148.01
Retail or bottle club licensee; warning sign; commission; duties.

Any retail or bottle club licensee shall post in a conspicuous place a sign which clearly reads as follows: Warning: Drinking alcoholic beverages during pregnancy can cause birth defects. The commission shall prescribe the form of such warning sign and shall make such warning signs available to all retail and bottle club licensees. Warning signs may be provided electronically by the commission to the licensee.

Laws 1989, LB 70, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 53-101.04;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 43;

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 24;

Laws 2022, LB1204, § 8.